Arkansas, session 2025, SB62.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Legislative intent.
It is the intent of the General Assembly to:
(1) Repeal the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program;
(2) Amend various sections of the Arkansas Code to end
Arkansas's participation in the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program; and
(3) Instruct the Governor to submit a waiver to:
(A) Transfer all individuals enrolled and participating in
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program to the traditional
*JMB152*
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
Arkansas Medicaid program on and after July 1, 2025; and
(B) Terminate the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program on December 31, 2026.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program — Notification of termination — Transfer of enrollees to the Arkansas
Medicaid Program.
(a) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Notify all persons enrolled in the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program as of the effective date of this act that the
Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program ends on December 31, 2026;
(2) Inform a new enrollee in the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Program after the effective date of this act that the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Program ends on December 31, 2026; and
(3) Transfer all persons enrolled in the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program or any person who enrolled in the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Program after July 1, 2025, to coverage under the
traditional Arkansas Medicaid Program on July 1, 2025.
(b) The department may prohibit new enrollees in the Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Program to begin the transition period before the
termination date of December 31, 2026.
(c) On the effective date of this act, the department shall submit any
Medicaid state plan amendments and federal waivers necessary to eliminate the
eligibility in the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program after
December 31, 2026.
(d) This section does not prohibit the payment of expenses incurred
before December 31, 2026, by persons participating in the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 19-5-984(b)(2)(D), concerning the Division
of Workforce Services Special Fund, is repealed.
(D) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., or its successor; and

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 19-5-1146 is repealed.
19-5-1146. Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program Trust Fund.
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(a) There is created on the books of the Treasurer of State, the
Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a trust fund to
be known as the “Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program Trust Fund”.
(b) The fund shall consist of:
(1) Moneys saved and accrued under the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., including without
limitation:
(A) Increases in premium tax collections; and
(B) Other spending reductions resulting from the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq.; and
(2) Other revenues and funds authorized by law.
(c) The Department of Human Services shall use the fund to pay for
future obligations under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program
created by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-
1001 et seq.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 23-61-803(h), concerning the Arkansas
Health Insurance Marketplace, is amended to read as follows:
(h) The State Insurance Department and any eligible entity under
subdivision (e)(2) of this section shall provide claims and other plan and
enrollment data to the Department of Human Services upon request to:
(1) Facilitate facilitate compliance with reporting requirements
under state and federal law; and
(2) Assess the performance of the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program established by the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., including without limitation the
program's quality, cost, and consumer access.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code Title 23, Chapter 16, Subchapter 10, is
repealed.
Subchapter 10 — Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021

23-61-1001. Title.
This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Arkansas Health
and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021”.

01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
23-61-1002. Legislative intent.
Notwithstanding any general or specific laws to the contrary, it is the
intent of the General Assembly for the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me
Program to be a fiscally sustainable, cost-effective, and opportunity-driven
program that:
(1) Achieves comprehensive and innovative healthcare reform that
reduces the rate of growth in state and federal obligations for providing
healthcare coverage to low-income adults in Arkansas;
(2) Reduces the maternal and infant mortality rates in the state
through initiatives that promote healthy outcomes for eligible women with
high-risk pregnancies;
(3) Promotes the health, welfare, and stability of mothers and
their infants after birth through hospital-based community bridge
organizations;
(4) Encourages personal responsibility for individuals to
demonstrate that they value healthcare coverage and understand their roles
and obligations in maintaining private insurance coverage;
(5) Increases opportunities for full-time work and attainment of
economic independence, especially for certain young adults, to reduce long-
term poverty that is associated with additional risk for disease and
premature death;
(6) Addresses health-related social needs of Arkansans in rural
counties through hospital-based community bridge organizations and reduces
the additional risk for disease and premature death associated with living in
a rural county;
(7) Strengthens the financial stability of the critical access
hospitals and other small, rural hospitals; and
(8) Fills gaps in the continuum of care for individuals in need
of services for serious mental illness and substance use disorders.

23-61-1003. Definitions.
As used in this subchapter:
(1) “Acute care hospital” means a hospital that:
(A) Is licensed by the Department of Health under § 20-9-
201 et seq., as a general hospital or a surgery and general medical care
hospital; and
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(B) Is enrolled as a provider with the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(2) “Birthing hospital” means a hospital in this state or in a
border state that:
(A) Is licensed as a general hospital;
(B) Provides obstetrics services; and
(C) Is enrolled as a provider with the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(3) “Community bridge organization” means an organization that
is authorized by the Department of Human Services to participate in the
economic independence initiative or the health improvement initiative to:
(A) Screen and refer Arkansans to resources available in
their communities to address health-related social needs; and
(B) Assist eligible individuals identified as target
populations most at risk of disease and premature death and who need a higher
level of intervention to improve their health outcomes and succeed in meeting
their long-term goals to achieve independence, including economic
independence;
(4) “Cost sharing” means the portion of the cost of a covered
medical service that is required to be paid by or on behalf of an eligible
individual;
(5) “Critical access hospital” means an acute care hospital that
is:
(A) Designated by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services as a critical access hospital; and
(B) Is enrolled as a provider in the Arkansas Medicaid
Program;
(6) “Economic independence initiative” means an initiative
developed by the Department of Human Services that is designed to promote
economic stability by encouraging participation of program participants to
engage in full-time, full-year work, and to demonstrate the value of
enrollment in an individual qualified health insurance plan through
incentives and disincentives;
(7) “Eligible individual” means an individual who is in the
eligibility category created by section 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1396a;
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(8) “Employer health insurance coverage” means a health
insurance benefit plan offered by an employer or, as authorized by this
subchapter, an employer self-funded insurance plan governed by the Employee
Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, Pub. L. No. 93-406, as amended;
(9) “Health improvement initiative” means an initiative
developed by an individual qualified health insurance plan or the Department
of Human Services that is designed to encourage the participation of eligible
individuals in health assessments and wellness programs, including fitness
programs and smoking or tobacco cessation programs;
(10) “Health insurance benefit plan” means a policy, contract,
certificate, or agreement offered or issued by a health insurer to provide,
deliver, arrange for, pay for, or reimburse any of the costs of healthcare
services, but not including excepted benefits as defined under 42 U.S.C. §
300gg-91(c), as it existed on January 1, 2021;
(11) “Health insurance marketplace” means the applicable
entities that were designed to help individuals, families, and businesses in
Arkansas shop for and select health insurance benefit plans in a way that
permits comparison of available plans based upon price, benefits, services,
and quality, and refers to either:
(A) The Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace created
under the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., or
a successor entity; or
(B) The federal health insurance marketplace or federal
health benefit exchange created under the Patient Protection and Affordable
Care Act, Pub. L. No. 111-148;
(12) “Health insurer” means an insurer authorized by the State
Insurance Department to provide health insurance or a health insurance
benefit plan in the State of Arkansas, including without limitation:
(A) An insurance company;
(B) A medical services plan;
(C) A hospital plan;
(D) A hospital medical service corporation;
(E) A health maintenance organization;
(F) A fraternal benefits society;
(G) Any other entity providing health insurance or a
health insurance benefit plan subject to state insurance regulation; or
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(H) A risk-based provider organization licensed by the
Insurance Commissioner under § 20-77-2704;
(13) “Healthcare coverage” means coverage provided under this
subchapter through either an individual qualified health insurance plan, a
risk-based provider organization, employer health insurance coverage, or the
fee-for-service Arkansas Medicaid Program;
(14) “Individual qualified health insurance plan” means an
individual health insurance benefit plan offered by a health insurer that
participates in the health insurance marketplace to provide coverage in
Arkansas that covers only essential health benefits as defined by Arkansas
rule and 45 C.F.R. § 156.110 and any federal insurance regulations, as they
existed on January 1, 2021;
(15) “Member” means a program participant who is enrolled in an
individual qualified health insurance plan;
(16) “Premium” means a monthly fee that is required to be paid
by or on behalf of an eligible individual to maintain some or all health
insurance benefits;
(17) “Program participant” means an eligible individual who:
(A) Is at least nineteen (19) years of age and no more
than sixty-four (64) years of age with an income that meets the income
eligibility standards established by rule of the Department of Human
Services;
(B) Is authenticated to be a United States citizen or
documented qualified alien according to the Personal Responsibility and Work
Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, Pub. L. No. 104-193;
(C) Is not eligible for Medicare or advanced premium tax
credits through the health insurance marketplace; and
(D) Is not determined by the Department of Human Services
to be medically frail or eligible for services through a risk-based provider
organization;
(18) “Risk-based provider organization” means the same as
defined in § 20-77-2703; and
(19) “Small rural hospital” means a critical access hospital or
a general hospital that:
(A) Is located in a rural area;
(B) Has fifty (50) or fewer staffed beds; and
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(C) Is enrolled as a provider in the Arkansas Medicaid
Program.

23-61-1004. Administration.
(a)(1) The Department of Human Services, in coordination with the
State Insurance Department and other state agencies, as necessary, shall:
(A) Provide healthcare coverage under this subchapter to
eligible individuals;
(B) Create and administer the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program by:
(i) Applying for any federal waivers, Medicaid state
plan amendments, or other authority necessary to implement the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Program in a manner consistent with this
subchapter; and
(ii) Administering the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program as approved by the Centers for Medicare & Medicaid
Services;
(C)(i) Administer the economic independence initiative
designed to reduce the short-term effects of the work penalty and the long-
term effects of poverty on health outcomes among program participants through
incentives and disincentives.
(ii) The Department of Human Services shall align
the economic independence initiative with other state-administered work-
related programs to the extent practicable;
(D) Screen, refer, and assist eligible individuals through
community bridge organizations under agreements with the Department of Human
Services;
(E) Offer incentives to promote personal responsibility,
individual health, and economic independence through individual qualified
health insurance plans and community bridge organizations; and
(F) Seek a waiver to reduce the period of retroactive
eligibility for an eligible individual under this subchapter to thirty (30)
days before the date of the application.
(2) The Governor shall request the assistance and involvement of
other state agencies that he or she deems necessary for the implementation of
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program.
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(b) Healthcare coverage under this subchapter shall be provided
through enrollment in:
(1) An individual qualified health insurance plan through a
health insurer;
(2) A risk-based provider organization;
(3) An employer-sponsored health insurance coverage; or
(4) The fee-for-service Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(c) Annually, the Department of Human Services shall develop
purchasing guidelines that:
(1) Describe which individual qualified health insurance plans
are suitable for purchase in the next demonstration year, including without
limitation:
(A) The level of the plan;
(B) The amounts of allowable premiums;
(C) Cost sharing;
(D) Auto-assignment methodology; and
(E) The total per-member-per-month enrollment range; and
(2) Ensure that:
(A) Payments to an individual qualified health insurance
plan do not exceed budget neutrality limitations in each demonstration year;
(B) The total payments to all of the individual qualified
health insurance plans offered by the health insurers for eligible
individuals combined do not exceed budget targets for the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program in each demonstration year that the Department of
Human Services may achieve by:
(i) Setting in advance an enrollment range to
represent the minimum and a maximum total monthly number of enrollees into
all individual qualified health insurance plans no later than April 30 of
each demonstration year in order for the individual qualified health
insurance plans to file rates for the following demonstration year;
(ii) Temporarily suspending auto-assignment into the
individual qualified health insurance plans at any time in a demonstration
year if necessary, to remain within the enrollment range and budget targets
for the demonstration year; and
(iii) Developing a methodology for random auto-
assignment of program participants into the individual qualified health
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
insurance plans after a suspension period has ended;
(C) Individual qualified health insurance plans meet and
report quality and performance measurement targets set by the Department of
Human Services; and
(D) At least two (2) health insurers offer individual
qualified health insurance plans in each county in the state.
(d)(1) The Department of Human Services, the State Insurance
Department, and each of the individual qualified health insurance plans shall
enter into a memorandum of understanding that shall specify the duties and
obligations of each party in the operation of the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program, including provisions necessary to effectuate the
purchasing guidelines and reporting requirements, at least thirty (30)
calendar days before the annual open enrollment period.
(2) If a memorandum of understanding is not fully executed with
a health insurer by January 1 of each new demonstration year, the Department
of Human Services shall suspend auto-assignment of new members to the health
insurers until the first day of the month after the new memorandum of
understanding is fully executed.
(3) The memorandum of understanding shall include financial
sanctions determined appropriate by the Department of Human Services that may
be applied if the Department of Human Services determines that an individual
qualified health insurance plan has not met the quality and performance
measurement targets or any other condition of the memorandum of
understanding.
(4)(A) If the Department of Human Services determines that the
individual qualified health insurance plans have not met the quality and
health performance targets for two (2) years, the Department of Human
Services shall develop additional reforms to achieve the quality and health
performance targets.
(B) If legislative action is required to implement the
additional reforms described in subdivision (d)(4)(A) of this section, the
Department of Human Services may take the action to the Legislative Council
or the Executive Subcommittee of the Legislative Council for immediate
action.
(e) The Department of Human Services shall:
(1) Adopt premiums and cost-sharing levels for individuals
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
enrolled in the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, not to exceed
aggregate limits under 42 C.F.R. § 447.56;
(2)(A) Establish and maintain a process for premium payments,
advanced cost-sharing reduction payments, and reconciliation payments to
health insurers.
(B) The process described in subdivision (e)(2)(A) of this
section shall attribute any unpaid member liabilities as solely the financial
obligation of the individual member.
(C) The Department of Human Services shall not include any
unpaid individual member obligation in any payment or financial
reconciliation with health insurers or in a future premium rate; and
(3)(A) Calculate a total per-member-per-month amount for each
individual qualified health insurance plan based on all payments made by the
Department of Human Services on behalf of an individual enrolled in the
individual qualified health insurance plan.
(B)(i) The amount described in subdivision (e)(3)(A) of
this section shall include premium payments, advanced cost-sharing reduction
payments for services provided to covered individuals during the
demonstration year, and any other payments accruing to the budget neutrality
target for plan-enrolled individuals made during the demonstration year and
the member months for each demonstration year.
(ii) The total per-member-per-month upper limit is
the budget neutrality per-member-per-month limit established in the approved
demonstration for each demonstration year.
(C) If the Department of Human Services calculates that
the total per-member-per-month limit for an individual qualified health
insurance plan for that demonstration year exceeds the budget neutrality per-
member-per-month limit for that demonstration year, the Department of Human
Services shall not make any additional reconciliation payments to the health
insurer for that individual qualified health insurance plan.
(D) If the Department of Human Services determines that
the budget neutrality limit has been exceeded, the Department of Human
Services shall recover the excess funds from the health insurer for that
individual qualified health insurance plan.
(f)(1) If the federal medical assistance percentages for the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Program are reduced to below ninety percent
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(90%), the Department of Human Services shall present to the Centers for
Medicare & Medicaid Services a plan within thirty (30) days of the reduction
to terminate the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program and
transition eligible individuals out of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
for Me Program within one hundred twenty (120) days of the reduction.
(2) An eligible individual shall maintain coverage during the
process to implement the plan to terminate the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program and the transition of eligible individuals out of
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program.
(g)(1) A health insurer that is providing an individual qualified
health insurance plan or employer health insurance coverage for an eligible
individual shall submit claims and enrollment data to the Department of Human
Services to facilitate reporting required under this subchapter or other
state or federally required reporting or evaluation activities.
(2) A health insurer may utilize existing mechanisms with
supplemental enrollment information to fulfill requirements under this
subchapter, including without limitation the state's all-payer claims
database established under the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative
Act of 2015, § 23-61-901 et seq., for claims and enrollment data submission.
(h)(1) The Governor shall request a block grant under relevant federal
law and regulations for the funding of the Arkansas Medicaid Program as soon
as practical if the federal law or regulations change to allow the approval
of a block grant for this purpose.
(2) The Governor shall request a waiver under relevant federal
law and regulations for a work requirement as a condition of maintaining
coverage in the Arkansas Medicaid Program as soon as practical if the federal
law or regulations change to allow the approval of a waiver for this purpose.

23-61-1005. Requirements for eligible individuals.
(a) An eligible individual is responsible for all applicable cost-
sharing and premium payment requirements as determined by the Department of
Human Services.
(b) An eligible individual may participate in a health improvement
initiative, as developed and implemented by either the eligible individual's
individual qualified health insurance plan or the department.
(c)(1)(A) An eligible individual who is determined by the department
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
to meet the eligibility criteria for a risk-based provider organization due
to serious mental illness or substance use disorder shall be enrolled in a
risk-based provider organization under criteria established by the
department.
(B) An eligible individual who is enrolled in a risk-based
provider organization is exempt from the requirements of subsections (a) and
(b) of this section.
(2)(A) An eligible individual who is determined by the
department to be medically frail shall receive healthcare coverage through
the fee-for-service Arkansas Medicaid Program.
(B) An eligible individual who is enrolled in the fee-for-
service Arkansas Medicaid Program is exempt from the requirements of
subsection (a) of this section.
(d) An eligible individual shall receive notice that:
(1) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program is not a
perpetual federal or state right or a guaranteed entitlement;
(2) The Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program is
subject to cancellation upon appropriate notice;
(3) Enrollment in an individual qualified health insurance plan
is not a right; and
(4) If the individual chooses not to participate or fails to
meet participation goals in the economic independence initiative, the
individual may lose incentives provided through enrollment in an individual
qualified health insurance plan or be unenrolled from the individual
qualified health insurance plan after notification by the department.

23-61-1006. Requirements for program participants.
(a) The economic independence initiative applies to all program
participants in accordance with the implementation schedule of the Department
of Human Services.
(b) Incentives established by the department for participation in the
economic independence initiative and the health improvement initiative may
include, without limitation, the waiver of premium payments and cost-sharing
requirements as determined by the department for participation in one (1) or
more initiatives.
(c) Failure by a program participant to meet the cost-sharing and
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
premium payment requirement under § 23-61-1005(a) may result in the accrual
of a personal debt to the health insurer or provider.
(d)(1)(A) Failure by the program participant to meet the initiative
participation requirements of subsection (b) of this section may result in:
(i) Being unenrolled from the individual qualified
health insurance plan; or
(ii) The loss of incentives, as defined by the
department.
(B) However, an individual who is unenrolled shall not
lose Medicaid healthcare coverage based solely on disenrollment from the
individual qualified health insurance plan.
(2) The department shall develop and notify program participants
of the criteria for restoring eligibility for incentive benefits that were
removed as a result of the program participants' failure to meet the
initiative participation requirements of subsection (b) of this section.
(3)(A) A program participant who also meets the criteria of a
community bridge organization target population may qualify for additional
incentives by successfully completing the economic independence initiative
provided through a community bridge organization.
(B) If successfully completing the initiative results in
an increase in the program participant's income that exceeds the program's
financial eligibility limits, a program participant may receive, for a
specified period of time, financial assistance to pay:
(i) The individual's share of employer-sponsored
health insurance coverage not to exceed a limit determined by the department;
or
(ii) A share of the individual's cost-sharing
obligation, as determined by the department, if the individual enrolls in a
health insurance benefit plan offered through the Arkansas Health Insurance
Marketplace.

23-61-1007. Insurance standards for individual qualified health
insurance plans.
(a) Insurance coverage for a member enrolled in an individual
qualified health insurance plan shall be obtained, at a minimum, through
silver-level metallic plans as provided in 42 U.S.C. § 18022(d) and § 18071,
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
as they existed on January 1, 2021, that restrict out-of-pocket costs to
amounts that do not exceed applicable out-of-pocket cost limitations.
(b) As provided under § 23-61-1004(e)(2), health insurers shall track
the applicable premium payments and cost sharing collected from members to
ensure that the total amount of an individual's payments for premiums and
cost sharing does not exceed the aggregate cap imposed by 42 C.F.R. § 447.56.
(c) All health benefit plans purchased by the Department of Human
Services shall:
(1) Conform to the requirements of this section and applicable
insurance rules;
(2) Be certified by the State Insurance Department;
(3)(A) Maintain a medical-loss ratio of at least eighty percent
(80%) for an individual qualified health insurance plan as required under 45
C.F.R. § 158.210(c), as it existed on January 1, 2021, or rebate the
difference to the Department of Human Services for members.
(B) However, the Department of Human Services may approve
up to one percent (1%) of revenues as community investments and as benefit
expenses in calculating the medical-loss ratio of a plan in accordance with
45 C.F.R. § 158.150;
(4) Develop:
(A) An annual quality assessment and performance
improvement strategic plan to be approved by the Department of Human Services
that aligns with federal quality improvement initiatives and quality and
reporting requirements of the Department of Human Services; and
(B) Targeted initiatives based on requirements established
by the Department of Human Services in consultation with the Department of
Health; and
(5) Make reports to the Department of Human Services and the
Department of Health regarding quality and performance metrics in a manner
and frequency established by a memorandum of understanding.
(d) A health insurer offering individual qualified health insurance
plans for members shall participate in the Arkansas Patient-Centered Medical
Home Program, including:
(1) Attributing enrollees in individual qualified health
insurance plans, including members, to a primary care physician;
(2) Providing financial support to patient-centered medical
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
homes to meet practice transformation milestones; and
(3) Supplying clinical performance data to patient-centered
medical homes, including data to enable patient-centered medical homes to
assess the relative cost and quality of healthcare providers to whom patient-
centered medical homes refer patients.
(e)(1) Each individual qualified health insurance plan shall provide
for a health improvement initiative, subject to the review and approval of
the Department of Human Services, to provide incentives to its enrolled
members to participate in one (1) or more health improvement initiatives as
defined in § 23-61-1003(9).
(2)(A) The Department of Human Services shall work with health
insurers offering individual qualified health insurance plans to ensure the
economic independence initiative offered by the health insurer includes a
robust outreach and communications effort which targets specific health,
education, training, employment, and other opportunities appropriate for its
enrolled members.
(B) The outreach and communications effort shall recognize
that enrolled members receive information from multiple channels, including
without limitation:
(i) Community service organizations;
(ii) Local community outreach partners;
(iii) Email;
(iv) Radio;
(v) Religious organizations;
(vi) Social media;
(vii) Television;
(viii) Text message; and
(ix) Traditional methods such as newspaper or mail.
(f) On or before January 1, 2022, the State Insurance Department and
the Department of Human Services may implement through certification
requirements or rule, or both, the applicable provisions of this section.

23-61-1009. Sunset.
This subchapter shall expire on December 31, 2026.

23-61-1010. Community bridge organizations.
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(a) The Department of Human Services shall develop requirements and
qualifications for community bridge organizations to provide assistance to
one (1) or more of the following target populations:
(1) Individuals who become pregnant with a high-risk pregnancy
and the child, throughout the pregnancy and up to twenty-four (24) months
after birth;
(2) Individuals in rural areas of the state in need of treatment
for serious mental illness or substance use disorder;
(3) Individuals who are young adults most at risk of poor health
due to long-term poverty and who meet criteria established by the Department
of Human Services, including without limitation the following:
(A) An individual between nineteen (19) and twenty-four
(24) years of age who has been previously placed under the supervision of
the:
(i) Division of Youth Services; or
(ii) Department of Corrections;
(B) An individual between nineteen (19) and twenty-seven
(27) years of age who has been previously placed under the supervision of the
Division of Children and Family Services; or
(C) An individual between nineteen (19) and thirty (30)
years of age who is a veteran; and
(4) Any other target populations identified by the Department of
Human Services.
(b)(1) Each community bridge organization shall be administered by a
hospital under conditions established by the Department of Human Services.
(2) A hospital is eligible to serve eligible individuals under
subdivision (a)(1) of this section if the hospital:
(A) Is a birthing hospital;
(B) Provides or contracts with a qualified entity for the
provision of a federally recognized evidence-based home visitation model to a
woman during pregnancy and to the woman and child for a period of up to
twenty-four (24) months after birth; and
(C) Meets any additional criteria established by the
Department of Human Services.
(3)(A) A hospital is eligible to serve eligible individuals
under subdivision (a)(2) of this section if the hospital:
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(i) Is a small rural hospital;
(ii) Screens all Arkansans who seek services at the
hospital for health-related social needs;
(iii) Refers Arkansans identified as having health-
related social needs for social services available in the community;
(iv) Employs local qualified staff to assist
eligible individuals in need of treatment for serious mental illness or
substance use disorder in accessing medical treatment from healthcare
professionals and supports to meet health-related social needs;
(v) Enrolls with the Arkansas Medicaid Program as an
acute crisis unit provider; and
(vi) Meets any additional criteria established by
the Department of Human Services.
(B) The hospital may use funding available through the
Department of Human Services to improve the hospital's ability to deliver
care through coordination with other healthcare professionals and with the
local emergency response system that may include training of personnel and
improvements in equipment to support the delivery of medical services through
telemedicine.
(4) A hospital is eligible to serve eligible individuals under
subdivision (a)(3) of this section if the hospital:
(A) Is an acute care hospital;
(B) Administers or contracts for the administration of
programs using proven models, as defined by the Department of Human Services,
to provide employment, training, education, or other social supports; and
(C) Meets any additional criteria established by the
Department of Human Services.
(c) An individual is not required or entitled to enroll in a community
bridge organization as a condition of Medicaid eligibility.
(d) A hospital is not:
(1) Required to apply to become a community bridge organization;
or
(2) Entitled to be selected as a community bridge organization.

23-61-1011. Health and Economic Outcomes Accountability Oversight
Advisory Panel.
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
(a) There is created the Health and Economic Outcomes Accountability
Oversight Advisory Panel.
(b) The advisory panel shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The following members of the General Assembly:
(A) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor;
(B) The Chair of the House Committee on Public Health,
Welfare, and Labor;
(C) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Education;
(D) The Chair of the House Committee on Education;
(E) The Chair of the Senate Committee on Insurance and
Commerce;
(F) The Chair of the House Committee on Insurance and
Commerce;
(G) An at-large member of the Senate appointed by the
President Pro Tempore of the Senate;
(H) An at-large member of the House of Representatives
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives;
(I) An at-large member of the Senate appointed by the
minority leader of the Senate; and
(J) An at-large member of the House of Representatives
appointed by the minority leader of the House of Representatives;
(2) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services;
(3) The Arkansas Surgeon General;
(4) The Insurance Commissioner;
(5) The heads of the following executive branch agencies or
their designees:
(A) Department of Health;
(B) Department of Education;
(C) Department of Corrections;
(D) Department of Commerce; and
(E) Department of Finance and Administration;
(6) The Executive Director of the Arkansas Minority Health
Commission; and
(7)(A) Three (3) community members who represent health,
business, or education, who reflect the broad racial and geographic diversity
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
in the state, and who have demonstrated a commitment to improving the health
and welfare of Arkansans, appointed as follows:
(i) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the Governor;
(ii) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate; and
(iii) One (1) member shall be appointed by and serve
at the will of the Speaker of the House of Representatives.
(B) Members serving under subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this
section may receive mileage reimbursement.
(c)(1) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services and one (1)
legislative member shall serve as the cochairs of the Health and Economic
Outcomes Accountability Oversight Advisory Panel and shall convene meetings
quarterly of the advisory panel.
(2) The legislative member who serves as the cochair shall be
selected by majority vote of all legislative members serving on the advisory
panel.
(d)(1) The advisory panel shall review, make nonbinding
recommendations, and provide advice concerning the proposed quality
performance targets presented by the Department of Human Services for each
participating individual qualified health insurance plan.
(2) The advisory panel shall deliver all nonbinding
recommendations to the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.
(3)(A) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, in
consultation with the State Medicaid Director, shall determine all quality
performance targets for each participating individual qualified health
insurance plan.
(B) The Secretary of the Department of Human Services may
consider the nonbinding recommendations of the advisory panel when
determining quality performance targets for each participating individual
qualified health insurance plan.
(e) The advisory panel shall review:
(1) The annual quality assessment and performance improvement
strategic plan for each participating individual qualified health insurance
plan;
(2) Financial performance of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
for Me Program against the budget neutrality targets in each demonstration
year;
(3) Quarterly reports prepared by the Department of Human
Services, in consultation with the Department of Commerce, on progress
towards meeting economic independence outcomes and health improvement
outcomes, including without limitation:
(A) Community bridge organization outcomes;
(B) Individual qualified health insurance plan health
improvement outcomes;
(C) Economic independence initiative outcomes; and
(D) Any sanctions or penalties assessed on participating
individual qualified health insurance plans;
(4) Quarterly reports prepared by the Department of Human
Services on the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, including
without limitation:
(A) Eligibility and enrollment;
(B) Utilization;
(C) Premium and cost-sharing reduction costs; and
(D) Health insurer participation and competition; and
(5) Any other topics as requested by the Secretary of the
Department of Human Services.
(f)(1) The advisory panel may furnish advice, gather information, make
recommendations, and publish reports.
(2) However, the advisory panel shall not administer any portion
of the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program or set policy.
(g) The Department of Human Services shall provide administrative
support necessary for the advisory panel to perform its duties.
(h) The Department of Human Services shall produce and submit a
quarterly report incorporating the advisory panel's findings to the President
Pro Tempore of the Senate, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and
the public on the progress in health and economic improvement resulting from
the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Program, including without
limitation:
(1) Eligibility and enrollment;
(2) Participation in and the impact of the economic independence
initiative and the health improvement initiative of the eligible individuals,
01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152

SB62
health insurers, and community bridge organizations;
(3) Utilization of medical services;
(4) Premium and cost-sharing reduction costs; and
(5) Health insurer participation and completion.

23-61-1012. Rules.
The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules necessary to
implement this subchapter.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 26-57-604(a)(1)(B)(ii), concerning the
allowance of a credit to be applied against the insurance premium tax, is
amended to read as follows:
(ii) However, the credit shall not be applied as an
offset against the premium tax on collections resulting from an eligible
individual insured under the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for Me Act of
2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the Arkansas Health Insurance Marketplace Act, §
23-61-801 et seq., or individual qualified health insurance plans, including
without limitation stand-alone dental plans, issued through the health
insurance marketplace as defined by § 23-61-1003.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 26-57-610(b)(2), concerning the disposition
of the insurance premium tax, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The taxes based on premiums collected under the Arkansas
Health and Opportunity for Me Act of 2021, § 23-61-1001 et seq., the Arkansas
Health Insurance Marketplace Act, § 23-61-801 et seq., or individual
qualified health insurance plans, including without limitation stand-alone
dental plans, issued through the health insurance marketplace as defined by §
23-61-1003 shall be:
(A) At the time of deposit, separately Separately
certified by the commissioner to the Treasurer of State at the time of
deposit for classification and distribution under this section; and
(B) Transferred to the Arkansas Health and Opportunity for
Me Program Trust Fund and used as required by the Arkansas Health and
Opportunity for Me Program Trust Fund;


01/14/2025 9:49:23 AM JMB152